Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-327.09
Minor; burden of proof.

If a physician
performed an abortion on a pregnant woman who is a minor without providing
the information required in section 28-327 to the pregnant woman's parent
or legal guardian, then the physician bears the burden of proving that the
pregnant woman was capable of independently evaluating the information given
to her.

Laws 2010, LB594, § 8.